Utah statutes.
78B-6-1402.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Action involving public participation in the process of government" means any lawsuit, cause of action, claim, cross-claim, counterclaim, or other judicial pleading or filing requesting relief to which this act applies.

(2)  "Government" includes a branch, department, agency, instrumentality, official, employee, agent, or other person acting under color of law of the United States, a state, or subdivision of a state or other public authority.

(3)  "Moving party" means any person on whose behalf the motion is filed.

(4)  "Process of government" means the mechanisms and procedures by which the legislative and executive branches of government make decisions, and the activities leading up to the decisions, including the exercise by a citizen of the right to influence those decisions under the First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution.

(5)  "Responding party" means any person against whom the motion described in Section 78B-6-1403 is filed.



Amended by Chapter 254, 2010 General Session

